Colorado statutes. TITLE 9 Safety - Industrial and Commercial
ARTICLE 2.5
HIGH VOLTAGE POWER LINES - SAFETY REQUIREMENTS

Section

9-2.5-101. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Authorized person" means:

An employee of a public utility which produces, transmits, or delivers electricity;

An employee of a public utility which provides and the work of which relates to communication services or an employee of a state, county, or municipal agency which has authorized circuit construction on or near the poles or structures of a public utility;

An employee of an industrial plant whose work relates to the electrical system of the industrial plant;

An employee of a cable television or communication services company or an employee of a contractor of a cable television or communication services company if specifically authorized by the owner of any necessary poles to make cable television or communication services attachments;

An employee or agent of a state, county, or municipal agency which has or the work of which relates to overhead electrical lines or circuit construction or conductors on poles or structures of any type.

"High voltage" means voltage in excess of six hundred volts measured between conductors or between a conductor and the ground.

"Overhead line" means all bare or insulated electrical conductors installed above the ground.

"Person or business entity" means a party contracting to perform any function or activity upon any land, building, highway, or other premises.

"Public utility" includes public service corporations, municipally owned electric systems, and districts subject to article XXV of the Colorado constitution.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 441, § 1, effective July 1.

9-2.5-102. Activity near overhead line - safety restrictions.

Unless danger against contact with high voltage overhead lines has been effectively guarded against as provided by section 9-2.5-103, a person or business entity shall not, individually or through an agent or employee, perform or require any other person to perform any function or activity upon any land, building, highway, or other premises if at any time during the performance of any function or activity it could reasonably be expected that the person performing the function or activity could move or be placed within ten feet of any high voltage overhead line or that any equipment, part of any tool, or material used by the person could be brought within ten feet of any high voltage overhead line during the performance of any function or activity.

No person shall operate an aircraft within ten feet of any high voltage overhead line.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 442, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 88:

Entire section amended, p. 398, § 1, effective April 6.

9-2.5-103. Activity in close proximity to lines - clearance arrangements - procedure - payment - notice.

If any person or business entity desires to temporarily carry on any function, activity, work, or operation in closer proximity to any high voltage overhead line than that which is permitted by this article, the person or business entity responsible for performing the work shall promptly notify the public utility operating the high voltage overhead line. The person or business entity may perform the work only after satisfactory mutual arrangements, including coordination of work and construction schedules, have been made between the public utility operating the lines and the person or business entity responsible for performing the work. In cases where the person or business entity responsible for doing the work is doing so under contract or agreement with a governmental entity, and the governmental entity and the public utility operating the lines have already made satisfactory mutual arrangements, further arrangements for that particular activity are not required. Arrangements may include placement of temporary mechanical barriers to separate and prevent contact between material, equipment, or persons and the high voltage overhead lines or temporary deenergization and grounding or temporary relocation or raising of the high voltage overhead lines. The public utility operating the line shall promptly provide to the person or entity responsible for doing the work or having the work done an estimate of the amount to be charged for providing temporary clearances.

The person or business entity responsible for performing the work in the vicinity of the high voltage overhead lines shall pay any actual expenses of the public utility operating high voltage overhead lines in providing arrangements for clearances, except when prior arrangements for payment have been made between a governmental entity for whom the work is to be done and the public utility operating the lines and except in instances where the public utility operating high voltage overhead lines has installed lines within fifteen feet of an existing fixture or structure after the fixture or structure has been in place at a permanent location. The public utility is not required to provide the arrangements for clearances until an agreement for payment has been made; except that, if there is a dispute over the amount to be charged by the utility for providing arrangements for clearance, the utility shall commence with providing temporary clearance as if agreement had then been reached. If agreement for payment has not been reached within fourteen days after completion of temporary clearance, the public utility and the person or business entity responsible for doing the work shall resolve such dispute by arbitration or other legal means. Unless otherwise agreed to by the person or business entity responsible for doing the work, the public utility shall commence construction for temporary clearances within three working days after the date an agreement for payment, if required, has been reached or, if no payment is required, within five working days after the date of the request of the person responsible for the work. Once initiated, the clearance work shall continue without interruption until completed. Should the public utility fail to provide for temporary clearances or safety measures in a timely manner, the public utility shall be liable for costs or loss of production of the person or business entity requesting assistance to work in close proximity to high voltage overhead lines.

A person requesting that the utility clear high voltage overhead lines shall not work near the lines until the utility notifies such person that the clearance is completed. If the location or the conditions of the planned work near a high voltage overhead line changes, the person shall notify the utility of such changes and cease all work until the utility has completed any additional clearance measures that may be necessary.

In locations where identity of the public utility operating the high voltage overhead lines is not easily known, the Colorado public utilities commission shall, upon request, provide the name, address, and telephone number of such utility for notification purposes.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 442, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(2) amended, p. 1412, § 1, effective April 29.

9-2.5-104. Violation.

A person who violates this article may be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars, to be imposed by any court of competent jurisdiction and credited to the general fund.

A person who violates this article more than once may be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed two thousand dollars for each violation, to be imposed by a court of competent jurisdiction and credited to the general fund. A person who violates this article more than once may be liable for reasonable attorney fees and costs incurred in the prosecution of the violations as determined by the court.

If a violation of this article results in physical or electrical contact with any high voltage overhead line, the person or business entity violating this article shall be liable to the owner or operator of the high voltage overhead line for damages to the facilities caused by the contact and for the liability incurred by the owner or operator due to the contact.

Provisions of subsection (2) of this section notwithstanding, any person or business entity who has made arrangements for safety clearances and who commences any prohibited activity, work, or operation prior to such safety clearances having been made shall be liable for any damages incurred as a result of physical or electrical contact with the high voltage overhead line.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 443, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1413, § 2, effective April 29.

9-2.5-105. Exemptions.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, this article does not apply to construction, reconstruction, operation, or maintenance by an authorized person of overhead electrical or communication circuits or conductors and their supporting structures, or to electrical generating, transmission, or distribution systems, or to communication systems, or to the collection of trash and refuse using equipment designed for that purpose, or to highway vehicles or agricultural equipment, including aerial applicators licensed pursuant to section 35-10-106, C.R.S., which in normal use may incidentally pass within the ten-foot clearance limitation, or to governmental entities responding to any emergency situation.

Highway vehicles shall not be operated within four and one-half feet of a high voltage overhead line unless the person or business entity operating the highway vehicle has complied with sections 9-2.5-102 and 9-2.5-103.

This subsection (2) shall not apply to highway vehicles operated by the Colorado department of transportation responding to emergency situations.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 443, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 88:

Entire section amended, p. 398, § 2, effective April 6.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 1413, § 3, effective April 29.

9-2.5-106. Compliance with national electrical safety code - due care.

Proof of compliance with the requirements of an applicable national electrical safety code standard, as published by the institute of electrical and electronics engineers or a successor entity, that is or was in effect at the time of the installation of the overhead line, establishes the highest degree of care in the defense of a negligence claim asserted by any person or entity that is exempt from this article pursuant to section 9-2.5-105.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 126, § 1, effective August 4.